apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="prpers__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jô</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>të</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òn</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òna</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òno</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>më</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òne</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mnie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cebie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jegò</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niegò</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gò</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jé</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jegò</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niegò</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gò</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nôs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naju</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naji</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>was</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wôs</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>waju</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>waji</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jejich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nich</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ppr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mnie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tobie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cë</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemù</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mù</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemù</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mù</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nóm</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nami</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wóm</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wama</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wami</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jim</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jima</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>

    <e lm="prpers"><i></i><par n="prpers__prn"/></e>
